Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Liquor Control
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative expenses ........... $ 86,213,307
(2) Marijuana regulation
- recreational ............................ $ 19,792,332
(3) Marijuana regulation
- medical ................................... $ 5,643,190
(4) Agents’ compensation
- all other .................................. $132,444,704
(5) Agents’ compensation
- distillery agents ...................... $ 2,941,000
(6) Capital improvements ............... $ 377,943
SECTION 2. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by  the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission for liquor purchases are not limited.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 578,  Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor  Control Commission, for administrative
expenses, is increased by $350,000 for expenses related to bank card transactions.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  1 (4), chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by  the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for capital improvements, is increased
by $150,000 for expenses related to sewer repair and replacement.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5519 (SB 5519-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5519 (SB 5519-A) Page 2